Indiana, session 2026, HB1178.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 24-5-0.5-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.104-2024,
SECTION 42, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3.(a) A supplier may not commit an unfair,
abusive, or deceptive act, omission, or practice in connection with a
consumer transaction. Such an act, omission, or practice by a supplier
is a violation of this chapter whether it occurs before, during, or after
the transaction. An act, omission, or practice prohibited by this section
includes both implicit and explicit misrepresentations.
(b) Without limiting the scope of subsection (a), the following acts,
and the following representations as to the subject matter of a
consumer transaction, made orally, in writing, or by electronic
communication, by a supplier, are deceptive acts:
(1) That such subject of a consumer transaction has sponsorship,
approval, performance, characteristics, accessories, uses, or
benefits it does not have which the supplier knows or should
2026 IN 1178—LS 6789/DI 119


reasonably know it does not have.
(2) That such subject of a consumer transaction is of a particular
standard, quality, grade, style, or model, if it is not and if the
supplier knows or should reasonably know that it is not.
(3) That such subject of a consumer transaction is new or unused,
if it is not and if the supplier knows or should reasonably know
that it is not.
(4) That such subject of a consumer transaction will be supplied
to the public in greater quantity than the supplier intends or
reasonably expects.
(5) That replacement or repair constituting the subject of a
consumer transaction is needed, if it is not and if the supplier
knows or should reasonably know that it is not.
(6) That a specific price advantage exists as to such subject of a
consumer transaction, if it does not and if the supplier knows or
should reasonably know that it does not.
(7) That the supplier has a sponsorship, approval, or affiliation in
such consumer transaction the supplier does not have, and which
the supplier knows or should reasonably know that the supplier
does not have.
(8) That such consumer transaction involves or does not involve
a warranty, a disclaimer of warranties, or other rights, remedies,
or obligations, if the representation is false and if the supplier
knows or should reasonably know that the representation is false.
(9) That the consumer will receive a rebate, discount, or other
benefit as an inducement for entering into a sale or lease in return
for giving the supplier the names of prospective consumers or
otherwise helping the supplier to enter into other consumer
transactions, if earning the benefit, rebate, or discount is
contingent upon the occurrence of an event subsequent to the time
the consumer agrees to the purchase or lease.
(10) That the supplier is able to deliver or complete the subject of
the consumer transaction within a stated period of time, when the
supplier knows or should reasonably know the supplier could not.
If no time period has been stated by the supplier, there is a
presumption that the supplier has represented that the supplier
will deliver or complete the subject of the consumer transaction
within a reasonable time, according to the course of dealing or the
usage of the trade.
(11) That the consumer will be able to purchase the subject of the
consumer transaction as advertised by the supplier, if the supplier
does not intend to sell it.
2026 IN 1178—LS 6789/DI 119


(12) That the replacement or repair constituting the subject of a
consumer transaction can be made by the supplier for the estimate
the supplier gives a customer for the replacement or repair, if the
specified work is completed and:
(A) the cost exceeds the estimate by an amount equal to or
greater than ten percent (10%) of the estimate;
(B) the supplier did not obtain written permission from the
customer to authorize the supplier to complete the work even
if the cost would exceed the amounts specified in clause (A);
(C) the total cost for services and parts for a single transaction
is more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750); and
(D) the supplier knew or reasonably should have known that
the cost would exceed the estimate in the amounts specified in
clause (A).
(13) That the replacement or repair constituting the subject of a
consumer transaction is needed, and that the supplier disposes of
the part repaired or replaced earlier than seventy-two (72) hours
after both:
(A) the customer has been notified that the work has been
completed; and
(B) the part repaired or replaced has been made available for
examination upon the request of the customer.
(14) Engaging in the replacement or repair of the subject of a
consumer transaction if the consumer has not authorized the
replacement or repair, and if the supplier knows or should
reasonably know that it is not authorized.
(15) The act of misrepresenting the geographic location of the
supplier by listing an alternate business name or an assumed
business name (as described in IC 23-0.5-3-4) in a local telephone
directory if:
(A) the name misrepresents the supplier's geographic location;
(B) the listing fails to identify the locality and state of the
supplier's business;
(C) calls to the local telephone number are routinely forwarded
or otherwise transferred to a supplier's business location that
is outside the calling area covered by the local telephone
directory; and
(D) the supplier's business location is located in a county that
is not contiguous to a county in the calling area covered by the
local telephone directory.
(16) The act of listing an alternate business name or assumed
business name (as described in IC 23-0.5-3-4) in a directory
2026 IN 1178—LS 6789/DI 119


assistance data base if:
(A) the name misrepresents the supplier's geographic location;
(B) calls to the local telephone number are routinely forwarded
or otherwise transferred to a supplier's business location that
is outside the local calling area; and
(C) the supplier's business location is located in a county that
is not contiguous to a county in the local calling area.
(17) The violation by a supplier of IC 24-3-4 concerning
cigarettes for import or export.
(18) The act of a supplier in knowingly selling or reselling a
product to a consumer if the product has been recalled, whether
by the order of a court or a regulatory body, or voluntarily by the
manufacturer, distributor, or retailer, unless the product has been
repaired or modified to correct the defect that was the subject of
the recall.
(19) The violation by a supplier of 47 U.S.C. 227, including any
rules or regulations issued under 47 U.S.C. 227.
(20) The violation by a supplier of the federal Fair Debt
Collection Practices Act (15 U.S.C. 1692 et seq.), including any
rules or regulations issued under the federal Fair Debt Collection
Practices Act (15 U.S.C. 1692 et seq.).
(21) A violation of IC 24-5-7 (concerning health spa services), as
set forth in IC 24-5-7-17.
(22) A violation of IC 24-5-8 (concerning business opportunity
transactions), as set forth in IC 24-5-8-20.
(23) A violation of IC 24-5-10 (concerning home consumer
transactions), as set forth in IC 24-5-10-18.
(24) A violation of IC 24-5-11 (concerning real property
improvement contracts), as set forth in IC 24-5-11-14.
(25) A violation of IC 24-5-12 (concerning telephone
solicitations), as set forth in IC 24-5-12-23.
(26) A violation of IC 24-5-13.5 (concerning buyback motor
vehicles), as set forth in IC 24-5-13.5-14.
(27) A violation of IC 24-5-14 (concerning automatic
dialing-announcing devices), as set forth in IC 24-5-14-13.
(28) A violation of IC 24-5-15 (concerning credit services
organizations), as set forth in IC 24-5-15-11.
(29) A violation of IC 24-5-16 (concerning unlawful motor
vehicle subleasing), as set forth in IC 24-5-16-18.
(30) A violation of IC 24-5-17 (concerning environmental
marketing claims), as set forth in IC 24-5-17-14.
(31) A violation of IC 24-5-19 (concerning deceptive commercial
2026 IN 1178—LS 6789/DI 119


solicitation), as set forth in IC 24-5-19-11.
(32) A violation of IC 24-5-21 (concerning prescription drug
discount cards), as set forth in IC 24-5-21-7.
(33) A violation of IC 24-5-23.5-7 (concerning real estate
appraisals), as set forth in IC 24-5-23.5-9.
(34) A violation of IC 24-5-26 (concerning identity theft), as set
forth in IC 24-5-26-3.
(35) A violation of IC 24-5.5 (concerning mortgage rescue fraud),
as set forth in IC 24-5.5-6-1.
(36) A violation of IC 24-8 (concerning promotional gifts and
contests), as set forth in IC 24-8-6-3.
(37) A violation of IC 21-18.5-6 (concerning representations
made by a postsecondary credit bearing proprietary educational
institution), as set forth in IC 21-18.5-6-22.5.
(38) A violation of IC 24-5-15.5 (concerning collection actions of
a plaintiff debt buyer), as set forth in IC 24-5-15.5-6.
(39) A violation of IC 24-14 (concerning towing services), as set
forth in IC 24-14-10-1.
(40) A violation of IC 24-5-14.5 (concerning misleading or
inaccurate caller identification information), as set forth in
IC 24-5-14.5-12.
(41) A violation of IC 24-5-27 (concerning intrastate inmate
calling services), as set forth in IC 24-5-27-27.
(42) A violation of IC 15-21 (concerning sales of dogs by retail
pet stores), as set forth in IC 15-21-7-4.
(43) A violation of IC 24-4-23 (concerning the security of
information collected and transmitted by an adult oriented website
operator), as set forth in IC 24-4-23-14.
(44) A violation of IC 24-16 (concerning social media
platforms), as set forth in IC 24-16-6-3.
(c) Any representations on or within a product or its packaging or
in advertising or promotional materials which would constitute a
deceptive act shall be the deceptive act both of the supplier who places
such representation thereon or therein, or who authored such materials,
and such other suppliers who shall state orally or in writing that such
representation is true if such other supplier shall know or have reason
to know that such representation was false.
(d) If a supplier shows by a preponderance of the evidence that an
act resulted from a bona fide error notwithstanding the maintenance of
procedures reasonably adopted to avoid the error, such act shall not be
deceptive within the meaning of this chapter.
(e) It shall be a defense to any action brought under this chapter that
2026 IN 1178—LS 6789/DI 119


the representation constituting an alleged deceptive act was one made
in good faith by the supplier without knowledge of its falsity and in
reliance upon the oral or written representations of the manufacturer,
the person from whom the supplier acquired the product, any testing
organization, or any other person provided that the source thereof is
disclosed to the consumer.
(f) For purposes of subsection (b)(12), a supplier that provides
estimates before performing repair or replacement work for a customer
shall give the customer a written estimate itemizing as closely as
possible the price for labor and parts necessary for the specific job
before commencing the work.
(g) For purposes of subsection (b)(15) and (b)(16), a telephone
company or other provider of a telephone directory or directory
assistance service or its officer or agent is immune from liability for
publishing the listing of an alternate business name or assumed
business name of a supplier in its directory or directory assistance data
base unless the telephone company or other provider of a telephone
directory or directory assistance service is the same person as the
supplier who has committed the deceptive act.
(h) For purposes of subsection (b)(18), it is an affirmative defense
to any action brought under this chapter that the product has been
altered by a person other than the defendant to render the product
completely incapable of serving its original purpose.
SECTION 2. IC 24-16 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
A NEW ARTICLE TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]:
ARTICLE 16. SOCIAL MEDIA PROVIDERS
Chapter 1. Definitions
Sec. 1. The definitions in this chapter apply throughout this
article.
Sec. 2. "Account", with respect to a social media platform,
means a unique identifier that:
(1) is provided to a person by the owner or operator of the
social media platform; and
(2) enables the person to:
(A) access the social media platform; or
(B) access functionality of the social media platform that is
not available without use of the unique identifier.
Sec. 3. (a) "Covered social media provider", or "provider",
means a person that:
(1) owns or operates a social media platform; and
(2) collectively with any parent, subsidiary, or affiliate of the
2026 IN 1178—LS 6789/DI 119


person, generated at least one billion dollars ($1,000,000,000)
in gross revenues, worldwide, in one (1) or more of the
immediately preceding three (3) years.
(b) The term does not include a communications service
provider (as defined in IC 8-1-2.6-13).
Sec. 4. "Indiana account holder", with respect to a social media
platform, means an individual:
(1) to whom the owner or operator of the social media
platform has provided an account with the social media
platform;
(2) who is:
(A) a resident of Indiana; or
(B) located in Indiana at the time the individual accesses
the social media platform; and
(3) who the owner or operator of the social media platform
knows, or reasonably should know, to be:
(A) a resident of Indiana; or
(B) located in Indiana at the time the individual accesses
the social media platform.
Sec. 5. "Linked account", with respect to an individual's
account with a social media platform, means another account with
the social media platform that the individual has designated,
through a means provided by the social media platform, as an
account:
(1) from which the individual wishes to receive content;
(2) content from which the individual wishes the social media
platform to include in recommendations for content provided
to the user by the social media platform; or
(3) with which the individual wishes to associate the
individual's account.
Sec. 6. "Minor" means an individual who:
(1) is less than fourteen (14) years of age; and
(2) is not legally emancipated.
Sec. 7. "Parent", with regard to a minor, includes any legal
guardian of the minor.
Sec. 8. (a) "Personal information", with regard to an individual,
means any of the following:
(1) Information regarding the individual that is described in
15 U.S.C. 6501(8).
(2) A record of, or derived from, the individual's:
(A) online activity;
(B) online search history; or
2026 IN 1178—LS 6789/DI 119


(C) online communications.
(3) Photographic or biometric information that is used, or
could reasonably be used, to identify the individual, including
fingerprints, voiceprints, iris or retina scans, facial templates,
and gait imagery or metrics.
(4) Geolocation information associated with the individual or
with a device owned or used by the individual.
(b) The term does not include the following:
(1) A search term, request, or selection expressly submitted by
an individual to a social media platform, if a record of the
search term, request, or selection is not retained by the social
media platform after the individual's termination of the
discrete session of use of the social media platform during
which the individual submits the search term, request, or
selection.
(2) An identifier used by a social media platform solely for the
purpose of directing personal communications to or from an
individual who is an account holder with the social media
platform.
(3) Social media platform account settings that:
(A) are set by:
(i) the individual who holds the account; or
(ii) if the individual is a minor, a parent of the individual;
and
(B) relate to:
(i) privacy;
(ii) accessibility;
(iii) blocking of age inappropriate content; or
(iv) technical specifications or requirements of a device
used by the individual to access the social media
platform.
Sec. 9. "Profile based commercial advertising" means
advertising:
(1) for which a covered social media provider receives
consideration in return for the provider disseminating the
advertising on the provider's social media platform;
(2) that seeks to encourage an account holder with the social
media platform to:
(A) engage in a commercial transaction; or
(B) follow a link to a website that encourages the account
holder to engage in a commercial transaction; or
(3) that has been selected or prioritized for display to the
2026 IN 1178—LS 6789/DI 119


account holder based, in whole or in part, on personal
information of the account holder, except as selected or
prioritized for the purpose of preventing display to the
account holder of material that by law, or under the policies
of the social media platform, may not be displayed to minors.
Sec. 10. "Profile based content feed" means a presentation by a
social media platform to an account holder of material that been
selected or prioritized for display to the account holder based, in
whole or in part, on personal information of the account holder,
except as selected or prioritized:
(1) based on the material having originated from an account
that the account holder has designated as a linked account; or
(2) for the purpose of preventing display to the account holder
of material that by law, or under the policies of the social
media platform, may not be displayed to minors.
Sec. 11. (a) "Push notification" means an audible, visual, or
tactile alert provided by a social media platform to an account
holder to:
(1) call the attention of the account holder to:
(A) the posting of content to the social media platform; or
(B) the submission of a response to content posted by the
account holder to the social media platform; or
(2) inform the account holder of any other information related
to the user's account with the social media platform.
(b) The term does not include an alert provided by a social
media platform to an account holder with the social media
platform for the purpose of informing the account holder of an
incoming:
(1) telephone call;
(2) text message;
(3) electronic mail message; or
(4) other communication;
made or sent by a human.
Sec. 12. (a) "Social media platform" means a publicly accessible
website or online application:
(1) for which a person can obtain an account; and
(2) that is used primarily as a medium by which:
(A) an account holder can disseminate information,
including:
(i) text;
(ii) media, such as images, audio, and video; or
(iii) both text and media; and
2026 IN 1178—LS 6789/DI 119


(B) advertising can be disseminated;
to other account holders, to public users of the website or
application, or to both other account holders and public users
of the website or application.
(b) The term does not include a website or online application to
which one (1) or more of the following apply:
(1) The website or online application:
(A) enables an account holder to transmit information,
including:
(i) text;
(ii) media, such as images, audio, and video; or
(iii) both text and media;
only to one (1) or more recipients that are specifically
designated by the account holder to receive the
transmission; and
(B) does not publicly display, or allow an account holder to
publicly display, information transmitted by the account
holder through the website or application.
(2) The website or online application is accessible only to
employees of:
(A) the owner or operator; or
(B) an affiliate of the owner or operator;
of the website or online application.
(3) The website or online application provides users of the
website or online application only with the ability to send and
receive electronic mail.
Sec. 13. "Verifiable parental consent" means verifiable parental
consent as defined by 15 U.S.C. 6501(9) that is obtained in
conformance with 16 CFR 312.5.
Chapter 2. Limitations and Requirements for Social Media
Accounts for Minors
Sec. 1. (a) A covered social media provider that receives a
request from an individual alleging to be an Indiana resident for
creation of an account with the provider's social media platform
shall comply with the following:
(1) The covered social media provider shall use commercially
reasonable means to determine the age and state of residence
of the individual requesting creation of the account.
(2) If the covered social media provider determines under
subdivision (1) that the individual requesting creation of the
account is:
(A) a minor; and
2026 IN 1178—LS 6789/DI 119


(B) a resident of Indiana;
the covered social media provider may create the account only if
the covered social media provider receives verifiable parental
consent to creation of the account from a parent of the minor.
(b) A covered social media provider that creates an account
with the provider's social media platform for a minor under
subsection (a) shall provide the minor's parent who provides
verifiable parental consent to the creation of the account with the
option to receive a separate password for the account that allows
the parent to:
(1) monitor the amount of time the minor spends using the
social media platform;
(2) set daily and weekly time limits on the minor's use of the
social media platform; and
(3) set limits on the times of day during which the minor can
access the social media platform.
Sec. 2. (a) A covered social media provider that creates an
account with the provider's social media platform for a minor
under section 1 of this chapter:
(1) shall configure the account such that any optional account
privacy settings or features are set to provide the account
with the maximum level of privacy protection available to an
account with the social media platform; and
(2) may modify the account configuration under subdivision
(1) only if the covered social media provider:
(A) receives verifiable parental consent to the modification
from a parent of the minor; or
(B) determines under IC 24-16-3 that the account holder is
no longer a minor.
(b) A covered social media provider that creates an account
with the provider's social media platform for a minor under
section 1 of this chapter shall configure the account such that the
account does not use or provide, and such that the account holder
may not activate or access, the following features or functionality
of the social media platform:
(1) A user interface that enables an account holder to view a
feed of content on the social media platform without
interruption, including by use of one (1) or more of the
following:
(A) Continuous loading of content without action on the
part of the account holder.
(B) Automatic loading of content as the account holder
scrolls through the user interface of the social media
platform.
2026 IN 1178—LS 6789/DI 119


(C) Display of pages with no visible or apparent end or
page breaks.
(2) Display of a profile based content feed.
(3) Display of push notifications.
(4) Audio or video that plays without an account holder
performing an affirmative act to activate the audio or video.
(5) Display of account metrics that indicate the number of
times other users of the social media platform have:
(A) viewed;
(B) submitted a reaction to; or
(C) reposted or shared;
content posted by an account holder to the social media
platform.
(6) Provision of awards, badges, tiers, or any other form of
recognition based on:
(A) the amount of time an account holder spends using the
social media platform;
(B) the number of other account holders that have
designated the account as a linked account;
(C) the number, frequency, or regularity of an account
holder's posts of content to the social media platform; or
(D) any other metric of an account holder's use of or
performance on the social media platform.
(7) Display of profile based commercial advertising.
A covered social media provider may modify the account
configuration under this subsection only if the covered social media
provider determines under IC 24-16-3 that the account holder is no
longer a minor.
Sec. 3. A covered social media provider that creates an account
with the provider's social media platform for a minor under
section 1 of this chapter may modify the terms and conditions
applicable to the account only if the covered social media provider:
(1) receives verifiable parental consent to the modification
from a parent of the minor; or
(2) determines under IC 24-16-3 that the account holder is no
longer a minor.
Chapter 3. Continuing Age Verification
Sec. 1. (a) Not later than fourteen (14) days after the first date
on which an Indiana account holder has spent at least twenty-five
(25) hours in a single six (6) month period using a covered social
media provider's social media platform, the covered social media
provider shall:
(1) make reasonable efforts; and
(2) use reasonable means, taking into consideration the
2026 IN 1178—LS 6789/DI 119


technology and data available to the covered social media
provider;
to determine the age of the Indiana account holder.
(b) Subject to subsection (d):
(1) if a covered social media provider is able to determine
under subsection (a) with eighty percent (80%) confidence
that an Indiana account holder is fourteen (14) years of age or
older, the covered social media provider may consider the
Indiana account holder to not be a minor for purposes of this
article; and
(2) if the covered social media provider is not able to
determine under subsection (a) with eighty percent (80%)
confidence that the Indiana account holder is fourteen (14)
years of age or older, the covered social media provider shall
consider the Indiana account holder to be a minor for
purposes of this article.
(c) Not later than fourteen (14) days after the first date on which
an Indiana account holder has spent at least fifty (50) hours in a
single six (6) month period using a covered social media provider's
social media platform, the covered social media provider shall
determine the age of the Indiana account holder as described under
subsection (a) for the purpose of verifying the covered social media
provider's determination of the Indiana account holder's age under
subsection (a).
(d) Subject to subsection (f):
(1) if a covered social media provider is able to determine
under subsection (c) with ninety percent (90%) confidence
that an Indiana account holder is fourteen (14) years of age or
older, the covered social media provider may continue to
consider the Indiana account holder to not be a minor for
purposes of this article; and
(2) if the covered social media provider is not able to
determine under subsection (c) with ninety percent (90%)
confidence that the Indiana account holder is fourteen (14)
years of age or older, the covered social media provider shall
consider the Indiana account holder to be a minor for
purposes of this article.
(e) Subject to subsection (g), a covered social media provider
shall determine the age of an Indiana account holder with the
covered social media provider's social media platform as described
under subsection (a) for the purpose of verifying the covered social
media provider's most recent determination of the Indiana account
holder's age:
(1) when the Indiana account holder has spent an additional
2026 IN 1178—LS 6789/DI 119


one hundred (100) hours using the social media platform
following the date on which the covered social media provider
determines the Indiana account holder's age under subsection
(c) and each time the Indiana account holder spends an
additional one hundred (100) hours using the social media
platform thereafter; and
(2) each time the covered social media provider collects
demographic information of any kind regarding the Indiana
account holder.
(f) Subject to subsection (g):
(1) if a covered social media provider is able to determine
under subsection (e) with ninety percent (90%) confidence
that an Indiana account holder is fourteen (14) years of age or
older, the covered social media provider may continue to
consider the Indiana account holder to not be a minor for
purposes of this article; and
(2) if the covered social media provider is not able to
determine under subsection (e) with ninety percent (90%)
confidence that the Indiana account holder is fourteen (14)
years of age or older, the covered social media provider shall
consider the Indiana account holder to be a minor for
purposes of this article.
(g) Once an Indiana account holder has held an account with a
covered social media provider's social media platform continuously
for seven (7) consecutive years, the covered social media provider
may, for purposes of the requirements to be met by a social media
platform under this article, consider the Indiana account holder to
not be a minor without determining the age of the Indiana account
holder under this section.
(h) A covered social media provider may make an age
determination under this section based on demographic
information collected by the covered social media provider in the
ordinary course of the covered social media provider's operation.
This section does not require a covered social media provider to
collect any demographic information.
Sec. 2. (a) This section applies if:
(1) a covered social media provider:
(A) determines under section 1 of this chapter; or
(B) receives information based on which the covered social
media provider knows, or reasonably should know;
that an Indiana account holder is a minor; and
(2) the covered social media provider did not receive
verifiable parental consent under IC 24-16-2-1 for creation of
the account.
2026 IN 1178—LS 6789/DI 119


(b) Not later than seven (7) days after the first date on which
this section applies to the account of an Indiana account holder
under subsection (a), the covered social media provider shall
transmit to the Indiana account holder notice that the account is
subject to termination due to the account's noncompliance with
this article. The notice must include:
(1) the requirement under this article with which the account
is noncompliant;
(2) notice that the Indiana account holder has thirty (30) days
within which to dispute the covered social media provider's
determination that the account is noncompliant; and
(3) instructions regarding the means under subsection (c) by
which the Indiana account holder may dispute the covered
social media provider's determination that the account is
noncompliant.
(c) A covered social media provider that provides notice to an
Indiana account holder under subsection (b) shall allow the
Indiana account holder thirty (30) days after the transmission date
of the notice to dispute the covered social media provider's
determination through:
(1) provision of verifiable parental consent from a parent of
the Indiana account holder to the continuation of the account;
or
(2) completion by the Indiana account holder of a
commercially reasonable age verification process as directed
by the covered social media provider.
(d) If, not later than thirty (30) days after the transmission date
of a notice transmitted to an Indiana account holder under
subsection (b):
(1) a parent of the Indiana account holder provides the
covered social media provider with verifiable parental
consent to the continuation of the account under subsection
(c)(1); or
(2) the Indiana account holder completes an age verification
process under subsection (c)(2) that results in a determination
by the covered social media provider that the Indiana account
holder is not a minor;
the covered social media provider shall not terminate the account
based on the covered social media provider's determination under
subsection (a)(1)(A) or the information under subsection (a)(1)(B).
(e) If, not later than thirty (30) days after the transmission date
of a notice transmitted to an Indiana account holder under
subsection (b):
(1) a parent of the Indiana account holder does not provide
2026 IN 1178—LS 6789/DI 119


the covered social media provider with verifiable parental
consent to the continuation of the account under subsection
(c)(1); or
(2) the Indiana account holder does not complete an age
verification process under subsection (c)(2);
the covered social media provider shall terminate the account at
the conclusion of the thirty (30) day period.
(f) If:
(1) an Indiana account holder who receives a notice under
subsection (b) completes an age verification process under
subsection (c)(2) not later than thirty (30) days after the
transmission date of the notice; and
(2) the age verification results in a determination by the
covered social media provider that the Indiana account holder
is a minor;
the covered social media provider shall terminate the account not
later than seven (7) days after receiving the results of the age
verification.
(g) A covered social media provider shall make a determination
regarding the results of an Indiana account holder's age
verification under subsection (c)(2) not later than thirty (30) days
after the date on which the Indiana account holder completes the
age verification process.
(h) A covered social media provider that receives verifiable
parental consent for the continuation of an account under this
section shall provide the parent with the option to receive a
separate password for the account as described under
IC 24-16-2-1(b).
Chapter 4. Voluntary Termination of Minor Accounts
Sec. 1. (a) A covered social media provider shall provide:
(1) a minor for whom the covered social media provider
creates an account under IC 24-16-2-1; and
(2) the parent who provides verifiable parental consent for the
creation of the account;
with a clearly explained, simple to use, and easily accessible means
of terminating the account.
(b) A covered social media provider shall terminate an account
created for a minor under IC 24-16-2-1:
(1) not later than seven (7) days after the covered social media
provider receives a request for termination of the account
from the account holder; or
(2) not later than fourteen (14) days after the covered social
media provider:
(A) receives a request for termination of the account from
2026 IN 1178—LS 6789/DI 119


a parent of the minor; and
(B) verifies, using the same means by which the covered
social media provider verifies verifiable parental consent,
that the individual requesting termination of the account
is a parent of the minor.
Chapter 5. Use and Retention of Information
Sec. 1. A covered social media provider that receives
information from an individual for the purpose of the individual's
provision of verifiable parental consent to the covered social media
provider:
(1) may not use the information for any purpose other than
registering the individual's provision of verifiable parental
consent; and
(2) shall, except as necessary to comply with any other
applicable state or federal law or regulation, delete the
information immediately after registering the individual's
provision of verifiable parental consent.
Sec. 2. A covered social media provider shall retain
documentation sufficient to reasonably establish that the covered
social media provider has received verifiable parental consent for
the creation of each active account for which verifiable parental
consent was required to be provided.
Chapter 6. Enforcement, Remedies, and Waiver
Sec. 1. A contract entered into between a covered social media
provider and a minor in violation of this article is void.
Sec. 2. (a) If a covered social media provider creates or
maintains an account for a minor in violation of this article:
(1) the minor; or
(2) a parent of the minor;
may bring a civil action against the covered social media provider.
(b) If the court in an action under subsection (a) finds that a
covered social media provider negligently violated this article, the
court may award the plaintiff:
(1) injunctive relief;
(2) actual damages, including emotional distress and harm to
the plaintiff's mental health; and
(3) court costs and reasonable attorney's fees.
(c) If the court in an action under subsection (a) finds that a
covered social media provider recklessly or knowingly violated this
article, the court may award the plaintiff:
(1) injunctive relief;
(2) the greater of:
(A) actual damages, including emotional distress and harm
to the plaintiff's mental health; or
2026 IN 1178—LS 6789/DI 119


(B) ten thousand dollars ($10,000); and
(3) court costs and reasonable attorney's fees.
(d) If the court in an action under subsection (a) finds that:
(1) a covered social media provider negligently, recklessly, or
knowingly violated this article; and
(2) the violation is part of a consistent pattern of violations of
this article by the covered social media provider;
the court may award the plaintiff punitive damages in addition to
the relief to which the plaintiff is entitled under subsection (b) or
(c).
(e) Subject to subsection (f), an action under this chapter must
be brought not later than three (3) years after the plaintiff knows,
or reasonably should know, of the violation alleged by the plaintiff.
(f) If the plaintiff in an action under this chapter is a minor at
the time the plaintiff knows, or reasonably should know, of the
violation alleged by the plaintiff, the limitation under subsection (e)
is tolled under IC 34-11-6.
(g) A covered social media provider is not liable for a violation
of this article if the covered social media provider has:
(1) made reasonable efforts; and
(2) used reasonable means, taking into consideration the
technology and data available to the covered social media
provider;
to comply with this article.
Sec. 3. (a) A covered social media provider that knowingly and
intentionally violates this article commits a deceptive act that is
actionable by the attorney general under IC 24-5-0.5 and that is
subject to the penalties and remedies available to the attorney
general under IC 24-5-0.5.
(b) If the attorney general has reasonable cause to believe that
a covered social media provider has engaged in, is engaging in, or
is about to engage in a violation of this article, the attorney general
may issue civil investigative demands under IC 4-6-3-3 to
investigate the suspected violation.
Sec. 4. An agreement by a minor or parent to waive or limit:
(1) a duty or prohibition applicable to a covered social media
provider under this article; or
(2) the rights of the minor or parent under this chapter;
is void and unenforceable.
2026 IN 1178—LS 6789/DI 119